Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201171-2453
Department of Correctional Services
facilities, detention facilities, or jails; prescription drug or device; return
for credit or relabeling and redispensing; requirements; liability; professional
disciplinary action.

(1) Prescription drugs or devices which
have been dispensed pursuant to a valid prescription and delivered to a Department
of Correctional Services facility, a criminal detention facility, a juvenile
detention facility, or a jail for administration to a prisoner or detainee
held at such facility or jail, but which are not administered to such prisoner
or detainee, may be returned to the pharmacy from which they were dispensed under
contract with the facility or jail for credit or for relabeling and redispensing
and administration to another prisoner or detainee held at such facility or
jail pursuant to a valid prescription as provided in this section.

(2)(a) The decision to accept return of a dispensed prescription drug
or device for credit or for relabeling and redispensing rests solely with
the pharmacist at the contracting pharmacy.

(b) A dispensed prescription drug or device shall be properly stored
and in the control of the facility or jail at all times prior to the return
of the drug or device for credit or for relabeling and redispensing. The drug
or device shall be returned in the original and unopened labeled container
dispensed by the pharmacist with the tamper-evident seal intact, and the container
shall bear the expiration date or calculated expiration date and lot number
of the drug or device.

(c) A prescription drug or device shall not be returned or relabeled
and redispensed under this section if the drug or device is a controlled substance
or if the relabeling and redispensing is otherwise prohibited by law.

(3) For purposes of this section:

(a) Administration has the definition found in section 38-2807;

(b) Calculated expiration date has the definition found in section
71-2421;

(c) Criminal detention facility has the definition found in section
83-4,125;

(d) Department of Correctional Services facility has the definition
of facility found in section 83-170;

(e) Dispense or dispensing has the definition found in section 38-2817;

(f) Jail has the definition found in section 47-117;

(g) Juvenile detention facility has the definition found in section
83-4,125;

(h) Prescription has the definition found in section 38-2840; and

(i) Prescription drug or device has the definition found in section
38-2841.

(4) The Jail Standards Board, in consultation with the Board of Pharmacy,
shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations relating to the return of
dispensed prescription drugs or devices for credit, relabeling, or redispensing
under this section, including, but not limited to, rules and regulations relating
to (a) education and training of persons authorized to administer the prescription
drug or device to a prisoner or detainee, (b) the proper storage and protection
of the drug or device consistent with the directions contained on the label
or written drug information provided by the pharmacist for the drug or device,
(c) limits on quantity to be dispensed, (d) transferability of drugs or devices
for prisoners or detainees between facilities, (e) container requirements,
(f) establishment of a drug formulary, and (g) fees for the pharmacy to accept the returned drug
or device.

(5) Any person or entity which exercises reasonable care in accepting,
distributing, or dispensing prescription drugs or devices under this section
or rules and regulations adopted and promulgated under this section shall
be immune from civil or criminal liability or professional disciplinary action
of any kind for any injury, death, or loss to person or property relating
to such activities.

Laws 2009, LB288, § 46;

Laws 2011, LB274, § 2.
August 27, 2011